Georgia, session 2025_26, HB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
advertising and sale of meat generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"26-2-162.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Animal' means any animal, including cattle, swine, sheep, goats, fish, and poultry,
including eggs, raised for the production of an edible product or products intended for
human consumption. Such term also includes game animals, as defined in Code Section
27-1-2.
(2) 'Lab-grown meat' means cell cultured meat.
H. B. 201
- 1 -

LC 44 2896
(3) 'Meat' means the flesh, offal, or other by-product of any part of the carcass of an
animal that has been slaughtered.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, trade, or distribute lab-grown
meat."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 201
- 2 -